Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-3207
Use of captured plate data and related evidence; prohibited.

No captured plate data and no evidence derived therefrom may be received in evidence in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding before any court, grand jury, department, officer, agency, regulatory body, legislative committee, or other authority of this state, or a political subdivision thereof, if the disclosure of that information would be in violation of the Automatic License Plate Reader Privacy Act.

Laws 2018, LB93, § 7.
July 19, 2018